Illinois, session 104th, SB3234.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)8    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.9    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 10required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 11equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 12defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 13greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 14or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 15exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 16obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 17regulations.18    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 19required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 20equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 21defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 22otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 23regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not   SB3234- 2 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply 2with other applicable rules or regulations.3    (c) (Blank). 4    (d) (Blank).5    (e) (Blank). 6    (f) As used in this Section:7    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 8output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 9Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 10Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 11    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 12sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 13calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 14greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 15by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 16CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 17them all together.18    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 19system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 20electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 21source.22    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 23have been identified by the United States Environmental 24Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.25    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 26fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined   SB3234- 3 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 2capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 3sale.4    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 5that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 6and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 7program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.8    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 9community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 10would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 11designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 12economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 13following areas:14        (1) areas where residents have been historically 15    excluded from economic opportunities, including 16    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 17    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 18    Tax Act; and19        (2) areas where residents have been historically 20    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 21    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 22    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 23    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 24    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.25    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 26means the persons who would most benefit from equitable   SB3234- 4 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 2foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 3person means the following people:4        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 5    investment eligible community;6        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 7    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 8    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 9    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 10    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 11    the last 5 years;12        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 13    in the foster care system; or14        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.15    "Existing emissions" means: 16        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 17    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 18    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 19    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 20    that unit's operation; and21        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 22    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 23    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 24    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 25    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 26    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which   SB3234- 5 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 2hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 3copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 4electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 5energy source.6    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 7GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 8unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 9nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 10capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 11including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 12oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.13    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 14emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 15Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 16Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 17recent year for which data is available.18    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 19GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 20including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 21by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 22municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 23other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 24and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.25    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 26output emission rate" as measured by the United States   SB3234- 6 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 2Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 3most recent year for which data is available.4    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 5use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 6shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 7zero no later than January 1, 2030.8    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 9use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 10permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 11December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 12also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 13emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 14reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 15the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 16its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 172038.18    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 19use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 20permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 21including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 22hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 23proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 24following:25        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 26    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions   SB3234- 7 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of 2    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 3    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 4    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 5    community that was designated by the Restore, Reinvest, 6    and Renew Program Board as of January 11, 2024 and that is 7    located in an R3 Area established under Section 10-40 of 8    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.9        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 10    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 11    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 12    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 13    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 14    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 15    eligible community that was designated by the Restore, 16    Reinvest, and Renew Program Board as of January 11, 2024 17    and that is located in an R3 Area established under 18    Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 19    After January 1, 2035, each such EGU and large greenhouse 20    gas-emitting unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at 21    least 50% from its existing emissions for CO2e, and shall 22    be limited in operation to, on average, 6 hours or less per 23    day, measured over a calendar year, and shall not run for 24    more than 24 consecutive hours except in emergency 25    conditions, as designated by a Regional Transmission 26    Organization or Independent System Operator.  SB3234- 8 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 2    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 3    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 4    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 5    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than 6    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 7    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 8    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 9    community that was designated by the Restore, Reinvest, 10    and Renew Program Board as of January 11, 2024 and that is 11    located in an R3 Area established under Section 10-40 of 12    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. Each such EGU and 13    large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its CO2e 14    emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions for 15    CO2e no later than January 1, 2030.16        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 17    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 18    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 19    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 20    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 21    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.22        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 23    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 24    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 25use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 26permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero,   SB3234- 9 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 2hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 3proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2045.4    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 5utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 6shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 7zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 8green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 9commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 10January 1, 2045.11    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 12uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 13emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 14that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 15    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 16GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 17emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 18specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 19been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 20this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 21necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 22ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 23EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 24operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 25reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 26GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:  SB3234- 10 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 2    participant in a regional transmission organization 3    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 4    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 5    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 6    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 7    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;8        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 9    participant in a regional transmission organization 10    receives notice that the regional transmission 11    organization has determined that continued operation of 12    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 13    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 14    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 15    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 16    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 17    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 18    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 19    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 20    identified by the regional transmission organization is 21    resolved; and22        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 23    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 24    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 25    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 26    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the   SB3234- 11 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 2    Illinois Commerce Commission.3    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 4relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 5emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 6Section.7    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 8shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 9forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 10units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 11the prior year.12    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 13Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 14Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 15publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 16State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 17development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 18emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 19developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 20current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 21reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 22years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 23Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 24Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 25Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 26Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations   SB3234- 12 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 2anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 3development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 4unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 5The report shall be released publicly by no later than 6December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 7Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 8Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 9data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 10energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 11and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 12the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 13subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 14adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 15sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 16MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 17regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 18transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 19will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 20the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 21Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 22or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 23requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 24to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 25State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 26deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a   SB3234- 13 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 2with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 3appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 4energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 5development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 6resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.7        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 8    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 9    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 10    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 11    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 12    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 13    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 14    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 15    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 16    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 17    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 18    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 19    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 20    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 21    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 22    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 23    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 24    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 25    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 26    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of   SB3234- 14 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 2    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 3    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 4    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 5    approval.6        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 7    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 8    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 9    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 10    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 11    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 12    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 13    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 14    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 15    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 16    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 17    mitigation plan within 180 days.18        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 19    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 20    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 21    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 22    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 23    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 24    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 25    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 26    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest   SB3234- 15 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 2    increases in emissions.3        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 4    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 5    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 6    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 7    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 8    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 9(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)11    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.12    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 13required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 14equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 15defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 16greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 17or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 18exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 19obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 20regulations.21    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 22required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 23equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 24defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 25otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in   SB3234- 16 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 2relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply 3with other applicable rules or regulations.4    (c) (Blank). 5    (d) (Blank).6    (e) (Blank). 7    (f) As used in this Section:8    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 9output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 10Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 11Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 12    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 13sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 14calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 15greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 16by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 17CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 18them all together.19    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 20system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 21electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 22source.23    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 24have been identified by the United States Environmental 25Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.26    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil   SB3234- 17 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 2cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 3capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 4sale.5    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 6that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 7and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 8program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.9    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 10community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 11would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 12designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 13economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 14following areas:15        (1) areas where residents have been historically 16    excluded from economic opportunities, including 17    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 18    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 19    Tax Act; and20        (2) areas where residents have been historically 21    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 22    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 23    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 24    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 25    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.26    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person"   SB3234- 18 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 2investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 3foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 4person means the following people:5        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 6    investment eligible community;7        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 8    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 9    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 10    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 11    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 12    the last 5 years;13        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 14    in the foster care system; or15        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.16    "Existing emissions" means: 17        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 18    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 19    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 20    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 21    that unit's operation; and22        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 23    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 24    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 25    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 26    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation.   SB3234- 19 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 2an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 3hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 4copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 5electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 6energy source.7    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 8GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 9unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 10nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 11capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 12including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 13oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.14    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 15emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 16Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 17Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 18recent year for which data is available.19    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 20GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 21including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 22by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 23municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 24other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 25and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.26    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total   SB3234- 20 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1output emission rate" as measured by the United States 2Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 3Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 4most recent year for which data is available.5    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 6use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 7shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 8zero no later than January 1, 2030.9    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 10use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 11permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 12December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 13also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 14emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 15reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 16the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 17its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 182038.19    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 20use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 21permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 22including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 23hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 24proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 25following:26        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large   SB3234- 21 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions 2    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of 3    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 4    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 5    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 6    community that was designated by the Restore, Reinvest, 7    and Renew Program Board as of January 11, 2024 and that is 8    located in an R3 Area established under Section 10-40 of 9    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.10        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 11    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 12    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 13    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 14    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 15    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 16    eligible community that was designated by the Restore, 17    Reinvest, and Renew Program Board as of January 11, 2024 18    and that is located in an R3 Area established under 19    Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 20    After January 1, 2035, each such EGU and large greenhouse 21    gas-emitting unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at 22    least 50% from its existing emissions for CO2e, and shall 23    be limited in operation to, on average, 6 hours or less per 24    day, measured over a calendar year, and shall not run for 25    more than 24 consecutive hours except in emergency 26    conditions, as designated by a Regional Transmission   SB3234- 22 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    Organization or Independent System Operator.2        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 3    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 4    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 5    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 6    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than 7    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 8    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 9    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 10    community that was designated by the Restore, Reinvest, 11    and Renew Program Board as of January 11, 2024 and that is 12    located in an R3 Area established under Section 10-40 of 13    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. Each such EGU and 14    large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its CO2e 15    emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions for 16    CO2e no later than January 1, 2030.17        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 18    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 19    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 20    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 21    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 22    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.23        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 24    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 25    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 26use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall   SB3234- 23 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 2including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 3hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 4proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2045.5    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 6utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 7shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 8zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 9green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 10commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 11January 1, 2045.12    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 13uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 14emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 15that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 16    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 17GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 18emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 19specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 20been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 21this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 22necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 23ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 24EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 25operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 26reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large   SB3234- 24 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:2        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 3    participant in a regional transmission organization 4    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 5    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 6    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 7    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 8    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;9        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 10    participant in a regional transmission organization 11    receives notice that the regional transmission 12    organization has determined that continued operation of 13    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 14    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 15    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 16    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 17    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 18    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 19    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 20    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 21    identified by the regional transmission organization is 22    resolved; and23        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 24    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 25    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 26    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g),   SB3234- 25 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 2    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 3    Illinois Commerce Commission.4    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 5relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 6emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 7Section.8    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 9shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 10forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 11units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 12the prior year.13    (o) The Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power 14Agency, and Illinois Commerce Commission shall jointly 15prepare, and release publicly, a report to the General 16Assembly that examines the State's current progress toward its 17renewable energy resource development goals, the status of 18CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions, the current status 19and progress toward developing and implementing green hydrogen 20technologies, the current and projected status of electric 21resource adequacy and reliability throughout the State for the 22period beginning 5 years ahead, and proposed solutions for any 23findings. The Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power 24Agency, and Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 25Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 26Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations   SB3234- 26 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 2anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 3development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 4unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 5The report shall be released publicly by no later than 6December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 7Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 8Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 9data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 10energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 11and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 12the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 13subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 14adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 15sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 16MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 17regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 18transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 19will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 20the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 21Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 22or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 23requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 24to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 25State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 26deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a   SB3234- 27 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 2with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 3appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 4energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 5development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 6resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.7        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 8    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 9    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 10    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 11    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 12    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 13    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 14    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 15    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 16    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 17    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 18    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 19    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 20    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 21    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 22    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 23    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 24    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 25    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 26    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of   SB3234- 28 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 2    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 3    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 4    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 5    approval.6        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 7    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 8    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 9    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 10    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 11    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 12    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 13    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 14    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 15    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 16    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 17    mitigation plan within 180 days.18        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 19    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 20    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 21    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 22    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 23    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 24    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 25    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 26    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest   SB3234- 29 -LRB104 17965 AAS 31402 b1    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 2    increases in emissions.3        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 4    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 5    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 6    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 7    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 8    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 9(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 10    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 11changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 12that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 13represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 14not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 15made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 16Public Act.